Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0949.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all individuals or vehicles using the bridge shall pay tolls and charges established by the authority. (2) The authority shall not charge tolls or charges to its own personnel or vehicles while the personnel are on duty or while the vehicles are being used for authority business. Beginning October 1, 2003, the (3) The authority shall not charge tolls or charges to authorized emergency vehicles that are in the process of responding to an emergency. As used in this section, "authorized emergency vehicles" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.2. Beginning November 1, 2004, a violation of (4) If an unscheduled closure of the bridge occurs lasting longer than 90 minutes, the authority shall not charge tolls or charges to any individual or vehicle after that closure of the bridge, using any means of payment, until the later of either of the following: (a) 3 hours after the bridge reopens. (b) The backup of traffic from the closure clears the bridge structure before the toll plaza. (5) An individual who violates this section by failure failing to pay a toll is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (6) As used in this section, "authorized emergency vehicle" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.2.